Washington statutes.
RCW 39.94.050

Financing program to be self-supporting—Payment of program expenses.

(1) It is the intent of the legislature that the financing program authorized by this chapter be self-supporting.

(2) The state treasurer is authorized to levy fees and apply specified investment earnings from time to time in amounts not to exceed sums sufficient to pay program expenses including, but not limited to, costs of issuance, and to create reserves to assure timely payment of financing contracts. The investment earnings available for this purpose represent the earnings on payments received from state and other agencies.

[ 1998 c 291 s 1.]

NOTES:

Application—1998 c 291: "Chapter 291, Laws of 1998 is applicable to an other agency, as defined in RCW 39.94.020, for the financing of equipment on September 1, 1998, and for the financing of real estate on July 1, 2000." [ 1998 c 291 s 6.]